Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.070

Admission of veterans.

Any person who shall have graduated from any accredited law school and after such graduation shall have served in the armed forces of the United States of America between December 7, 1941, and the termination of the present World War, may be admitted to the practice of law in the state of Washington and to membership in the Washington State Bar Association, upon motion made before the supreme court of the state of Washington, provided the following is made to appear:

(1) That the applicant is a person of good moral character over the age of twenty-one years;

(2) That the applicant, at the time of entering the armed forces of the United States, was a legal resident of the state of Washington;

(3) That the applicant's service in the armed forces of the United States is or was satisfactory. An applicant's service is satisfactory if he or she meets the definition of "veteran" under RCW 41.04.007.

[ 2024 c 146 s 6; 1945 c 181 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 138-7A.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Qualifications for admission to practice as prescribed by Rules of court: Admission to Practice Rules.